Utah statutes.
41-1a-1007.   Fees.

(1)  A certified vehicle inspector may charge a fee in accordance with Section 63J-1-504 for each inspection under Subsection 41-1a-1002(1).

(2)  To cover the costs of inspection and to defray the cost of certification, the fee charged under this section by a certified vehicle inspector shall be retained by the Motor Vehicle Enforcement Division as a dedicated credit.

